District of Columbia statutes.
9-1105.03

Severability.

If any part of this subchapter is declared unconstitutional the constitutionality of no other part of the subchapter shall be affected thereby.

History

Sept. 8, 1965, 79 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 89-173, § 8

Cross References

Whistleblower protection for other employees, “instrumentality” defined, see § 2-223.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2423.
1973 Ed., § 1-1426.